Massachusetts, session 194th, H187.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 4 of chapter 94G of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking out the figure “85”, in line 232, and inserting in place thereof the
following figure:- 90.
of 1